West Virginia, session 2025, SB943.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 13. INSPECTION AND PROTECTION OF AGRICULTURE. THE WEST VIRGINIA APIARY ACT. §19-13-1. Short title; findings. (a) This article may be cited shall be known as the West Virginia Apiary Act.(b) The Legislature finds that pollinators such as honeybees, have been in drastic decline in this state and nationwide for several decades. (c) The Legislature finds that protecting pollinators, including, but not limited to, honeybees, is of critical importance to maintaining and building our state’s economy, specifically agricultural practices which are reliant on pollinators.(d) The Legislature finds that the practice of beekeeping has had a positive economic impact to the state of West Virginia and as well as to the food security of this state’s residents, and is critical to maintaining both. (e) The Legislature further finds that the private keeping and maintaining of honeybee colonies in apiaries by West Virginia citizens is critical to increasing pollinators on which our state’s agricultural operations rely. (f) Accordingly, the Legislature finds that beekeeping and apiaries are agricultural operations as defined by §19-19-2(a) of this code, the practice of which shall be regulated by the Commissioner of Agriculture. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home